Illinois, session 104th, SB4007.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 232 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/232)7    Sec. 232. Tax credit for agritourism liability insurance. 8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92022 and ending on or before December 31, 2023, any individual 10or entity that operates an agritourism operation in the State 11during the taxable year shall be entitled to a tax credit 12against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 13201 equal to the lesser of 100% of the liability insurance 14premiums paid by that individual or entity during the taxable 15year or $1,000. For taxable years beginning on or after 16January 1, 2027, any individual or entity that engages in 17beekeeping at a qualified beekeeping property during the 18taxable year shall be entitled to a tax credit against the tax 19imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 equal to the 20lesser of (i) 100% of the liability insurance premiums paid by 21that individual or entity during the taxable year in 22connection with the qualified beekeeping property or (ii) 23$1,000. To claim the credit, the taxpayer must apply to the   SB4007- 2 -LRB104 20754 HLH 34258 b1Department of Agriculture for a certificate of credit in the 2form and manner required by the Department of Agriculture by 3rule. If granted, the taxpayer shall attach a copy of the 4certificate of credit to his or her Illinois income tax return 5for the taxable year. The total amount of credits that may be 6awarded by the Department of Agriculture may not exceed 7$1,000,000 in any calendar year.8    (b) For the purposes of this Section:9    "Agricultural property" means property that is used in 10whole or in part for production agriculture, as defined in 11Section 3-35 of the Use Tax Act, or used in connection with one 12or more of the following:13        (1) the growing and harvesting of crops;14        (2) the feeding, breeding, and management of 15    livestock;16        (3) dairying or any other agricultural or 17    horticultural use or combination of those uses, including, 18    but not limited to, the harvesting of hay, grain, fruit, 19    or truck or vegetable crops, or floriculture, mushroom 20    growing, plant or tree nurseries, orchards, forestry, sod 21    farming, or greenhouses; or22        (4) the keeping, raising, and feeding of livestock or 23    poultry, including dairying, poultry, swine, sheep, beef 24    cattle, ponies or horses, fur farming, bees, fish and 25    wildlife farming. 26    "Agritourism activities" includes, but is not limited to,   SB4007- 3 -LRB104 20754 HLH 34258 b1the following:2        (1) historic, cultural, and on-site educational 3    programs;4        (2) guided and self-guided tours, including school 5    tours;6        (3) animal exhibitions or petting zoos;7        (4) agricultural crop mazes, such as corn or flower 8    mazes;9        (5) harvest-your-own or U-pick operations;10        (6) horseback or pony rides; and11        (7) hayrides or sleigh rides.12    "Agritourism activities" does not include the following 13activities:14        (1) hunting;15        (2) fishing;16        (3) amusement rides;17        (4) rodeos;18        (5) off-road biking or motorized off-highway or 19    all-terrain vehicle activities;20        (6) boating, swimming, canoeing, hiking, camping, 21    skiing, bounce houses, or similar activities; or22        (7) entertainment venues such as weddings or concerts.23    "Agritourism operation" means an individual or entity that 24carries out agricultural activities on agricultural property 25and allows members of the general public, for recreational, 26entertainment, or educational purposes, to view or enjoy those   SB4007- 4 -LRB104 20754 HLH 34258 b1activities.2    "Qualified beekeeping property" means property located in 3the State that encompasses between 5 and 20 acres and has 6 or 4more but not more than 12 active beehives. 5    (c) If the taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 6corporation, the credit shall be allowed to the partners or 7shareholders in accordance with the determination of income 8and distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 9and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. 10    (d) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 11the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 12the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 13may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 145 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 15credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 16a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 17that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 18shall be applied first. 19(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)